Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.

§ 4.1-206.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2022.

History.

Former §

4.1-206

, relating to alcoholic beverage licenses, was derived from Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 526, 528; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 200; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, c. 707; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, c. 866; 1996, cc. 584, 596; 1998, c. 489; 1999, c. 325; 2005, c. 911; 2006, cc. 737, 826; 2007, c. 101; 2008, c. 198; 2013, c. 476; 2014, c. 510; 2015, cc. 348, 393, 412, 502, 503, 695; 2016, c. 644; 2017, cc. 157, 492; 2018, cc. 173, 334; 2019, cc. 622, 628; 2020, cc. 16, 34, 756; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 34; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390, 391.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to distillers’ licenses, limited distillers’ licenses, and other manufacturer licenses, see §

4.1-206.1

; and for banquet, bed and breakfast, museum, tastings, and other retail licenses, see §

4.1-206.3

.

§ 4.1-206.1.
(Effective until July 1, 2024) Manufacturer licenses.

The Board may grant the following manufacturer licenses:

Distiller’s licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture alcoholic beverages other than wine and beer, and to sell and deliver or ship the same, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to the Board and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth. When the Board has established a government store on the distiller’s licensed premises pursuant to subsection D of §

4.1-119

, such license shall also authorize the licensee to make a charge to consumers to participate in an organized tasting event conducted in accordance with subsection G of §

4.1-119

and Board regulations.

Limited distiller’s licenses, to distilleries that (i) are located on a farm in the Commonwealth on land zoned agricultural and owned or leased by such distillery or its owner and (ii) use agricultural products that are grown on the farm in the manufacture of their alcoholic beverages. Limited distiller’s licensees shall be treated as distillers for all purposes of this subtitle except as otherwise provided in this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” means (a) land zoned as an agricultural district or classification or (b) land otherwise permitted by a locality for limited distillery use. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” does not include land zoned “residential conservation.” Except for the limitation on land zoned “residential conservation,” nothing in this definition shall otherwise limit or affect local zoning authority.

Brewery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture beer and to sell and deliver or ship the beer so manufactured, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers to (i) persons licensed to sell the beer at wholesale and (ii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth. Such license shall also authorize the licensee to sell at retail at premises described in the brewery license (a) the brands of beer that the brewery owns for on-premises consumption, provided that not less than 20 percent of the volume of beer sold for on-premises consumption in any calendar year is manufactured on the licensed premises, and (b) beer in closed containers, which shall include growlers and other reusable containers, for off-premises consumption.

Limited brewery licenses, to breweries that manufacture no more than 15,000 barrels of beer per calendar year, provided that (i) the brewery is located on a farm in the Commonwealth on land zoned agricultural and owned or leased by such brewery or its owner and (ii) agricultural products, including barley, other grains, hops, or fruit, used by such brewery in the manufacture of its beer are grown on the farm. The licensed premises shall be limited to the portion of the farm on which agricultural products, including barley, other grains, hops, or fruit, used by such brewery in the manufacture of its beer are grown and that is contiguous to the premises of such brewery where the beer is manufactured, exclusive of any residence and the curtilage thereof. However, the Board may, with notice to the local governing body in accordance with the provisions of §

4.1-230

, also approve other portions of the farm to be included as part of the licensed premises. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” means (a) land zoned as an agricultural district or classification or (b) land otherwise permitted by a locality for limited brewery use. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” does not include land zoned “residential conservation.” Except for the limitation on land zoned “residential conservation,” nothing in this definition shall otherwise limit or affect local zoning authority.Limited brewery licensees shall be treated as breweries for all purposes of this subtitle except as otherwise provided in this subdivision.

Winery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture wine and to sell and deliver or ship the wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons licensed to sell the wine so manufactured at wholesale for the purpose of resale, and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth. In addition, such license shall authorize the licensee to (i) operate distilling equipment on the premises of the licensee in the manufacture of spirits from fruit or fruit juices only, which shall be used only for the fortification of wine produced by the licensee; (ii) operate a contract winemaking facility on the premises of the licensee in accordance with Board regulations; (iii) store wine in bonded warehouses on or off the licensed premises upon permit issued by the Board; and (iv) sell wine at retail at the place of business designated in the winery license for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption, provided that any brand of wine not owned by the winery licensee is purchased from a wholesale wine licensee and any wine sold for on-premises consumption is manufactured on the licensed premises.

Farm winery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture wine containing 21 percent or less of alcohol by volume and to sell, deliver, or ship the wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to (i) the Board, (ii) persons licensed to sell the wine so manufactured at wholesale for the purpose of resale, or (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth. In addition, the licensee may (a) acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of wine and sell and deliver or ship this wine, in accordance with Board regulations, to the Board, persons licensed to sell wine at wholesale for the purpose of resale, or persons outside the Commonwealth; (b) operate a contract winemaking facility on the premises of the licensee in accordance with Board regulations; and (c) store wine in bonded warehouses located on or off the licensed premises upon permits issued by the Board. For the purposes of this subtitle, a farm winery license shall be designated either as a Class A or Class B farm winery license in accordance with the limitations set forth in §

4.1-219

. A farm winery may enter into an agreement in accordance with Board regulations with a winery or farm winery licensee operating a contract winemaking facility.Such licenses shall also authorize the licensee to sell wine at retail at the places of business designated in the licenses, which may include no more than five additional retail establishments of the licensee. Wine may be sold at these business places for on-premises consumption and in closed containers for off-premises consumption, provided that any brand of wine not owned by the farm winery licensee is purchased from a wholesale wine licensee. In addition, wine may be pre-mixed by the licensee to be served and sold for on-premises or off-premises consumption at these business places.

Wine importer’s licenses, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and deliver or ship wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons in the Commonwealth licensed to sell such wine at wholesale for the purpose of resale, and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

Beer importer’s licenses, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and deliver or ship beer, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons in the Commonwealth licensed to sell such beer at wholesale for the purpose of resale and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

History.

2020, cc. 756, 1008, 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282.

Section set out twice.

The section set out above is effective until July 1, 2024. For the version of this section effective July 1, 2024, see the following section, also numbered
§

4.1-206.1

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

4.1-206

was repealed by Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission the amendments to former §

4.1-206

by Acts
2020, c. 756 were incorporated in the first sentence of subdivision 2 of this section, by substituting “that (i) are located” for “that manufacture not more than 36,000 gallons of alcoholic beverages other than wine or beer per calendar year, provided (i) the distillery is located,” and in clause (ii) substituting “use agricultural products that are grown on the farm in the manufacture of their alcoholic beverages” for “agricultural products used by such distillery in the manufacture of its alcoholic beverages are grown on the farm.”

Former §

4.1-207

was repealed by Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission the amendments to former §

4.1-207

by Acts
2020, c. 1008 were incorporated in subdivision 5 of this section, by inserting “for on-premises consumption or” and “and any wine sold for on-premises consumption is manufactured on the licensed premises” in clause (iv).

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 5, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That any person who (i) is licensed pursuant to subdivision A 9, 11, 12, 14, 18, or 19 of
§

4.1-206

of the Code of Virginia, as it was in effect prior to July 1, 2020, and (ii) wishes to maintain licensure after December 31, 2021, shall apply for a marketplace license on or before July 1, 2021.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or
§

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and
282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 2 provides: ‘‘That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.’’

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and
282, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall convene a work group to study the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption. In conducting the study, the work group shall analyze the implementation of the provisions of this act that authorize the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption, determine whether such provisions should be implemented permanently, and identify any further statutory or regulatory modifications that should be made in the event that such provisions are made permanent. The Authority shall report its findings and recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the second paragraph in subdivision 6, inserted “or off-premises” in the last sentence. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

§ 4.1-206.1.
(Effective July 1, 2024) Manufacturer licenses.

The Board may grant the following manufacturer licenses:

Distiller’s licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture alcoholic beverages other than wine and beer, and to sell and deliver or ship the same, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to the Board and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth. When the Board has established a government store on the distiller’s licensed premises pursuant to subsection D of §

4.1-119

, such license shall also authorize the licensee to make a charge to consumers to participate in an organized tasting event conducted in accordance with subsection G of §

4.1-119

and Board regulations.

Limited distiller’s licenses, to distilleries that (i) are located on a farm in the Commonwealth on land zoned agricultural and owned or leased by such distillery or its owner and (ii) use agricultural products that are grown on the farm in the manufacture of their alcoholic beverages. Limited distiller’s licensees shall be treated as distillers for all purposes of this subtitle except as otherwise provided in this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” means (a) land zoned as an agricultural district or classification or (b) land otherwise permitted by a locality for limited distillery use. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” does not include land zoned “residential conservation.” Except for the limitation on land zoned “residential conservation,” nothing in this definition shall otherwise limit or affect local zoning authority.

Brewery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture beer and to sell and deliver or ship the beer so manufactured, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers to (i) persons licensed to sell the beer at wholesale and (ii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth. Such license shall also authorize the licensee to sell at retail at premises described in the brewery license (a) the brands of beer that the brewery owns for on-premises consumption, provided that not less than 20 percent of the volume of beer sold for on-premises consumption in any calendar year is manufactured on the licensed premises, and (b) beer in closed containers, which shall include growlers and other reusable containers, for off-premises consumption.

Limited brewery licenses, to breweries that manufacture no more than 15,000 barrels of beer per calendar year, provided that (i) the brewery is located on a farm in the Commonwealth on land zoned agricultural and owned or leased by such brewery or its owner and (ii) agricultural products, including barley, other grains, hops, or fruit, used by such brewery in the manufacture of its beer are grown on the farm. The licensed premises shall be limited to the portion of the farm on which agricultural products, including barley, other grains, hops, or fruit, used by such brewery in the manufacture of its beer are grown and that is contiguous to the premises of such brewery where the beer is manufactured, exclusive of any residence and the curtilage thereof. However, the Board may, with notice to the local governing body in accordance with the provisions of §

4.1-230

, also approve other portions of the farm to be included as part of the licensed premises. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” means (a) land zoned as an agricultural district or classification or (b) land otherwise permitted by a locality for limited brewery use. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” does not include land zoned “residential conservation.” Except for the limitation on land zoned “residential conservation,” nothing in this definition shall otherwise limit or affect local zoning authority.Limited brewery licensees shall be treated as breweries for all purposes of this subtitle except as otherwise provided in this subdivision.

Winery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture wine and to sell and deliver or ship the wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons licensed to sell the wine so manufactured at wholesale for the purpose of resale, and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth. In addition, such license shall authorize the licensee to (i) operate distilling equipment on the premises of the licensee in the manufacture of spirits from fruit or fruit juices only, which shall be used only for the fortification of wine produced by the licensee; (ii) operate a contract winemaking facility on the premises of the licensee in accordance with Board regulations; (iii) store wine in bonded warehouses on or off the licensed premises upon permit issued by the Board; and (iv) sell wine at retail at the place of business designated in the winery license for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption, provided that any brand of wine not owned by the winery licensee is purchased from a wholesale wine licensee and any wine sold for on-premises consumption is manufactured on the licensed premises.

Farm winery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture wine containing 21 percent or less of alcohol by volume and to sell, deliver, or ship the wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to (i) the Board, (ii) persons licensed to sell the wine so manufactured at wholesale for the purpose of resale, or (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth. In addition, the licensee may (a) acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of wine and sell and deliver or ship this wine, in accordance with Board regulations, to the Board, persons licensed to sell wine at wholesale for the purpose of resale, or persons outside the Commonwealth; (b) operate a contract winemaking facility on the premises of the licensee in accordance with Board regulations; and (c) store wine in bonded warehouses located on or off the licensed premises upon permits issued by the Board. For the purposes of this subtitle, a farm winery license shall be designated either as a Class A or Class B farm winery license in accordance with the limitations set forth in §

4.1-219

. A farm winery may enter into an agreement in accordance with Board regulations with a winery or farm winery licensee operating a contract winemaking facility.Such licenses shall also authorize the licensee to sell wine at retail at the places of business designated in the licenses, which may include no more than five additional retail establishments of the licensee. Wine may be sold at these business places for on-premises consumption and in closed containers for off-premises consumption, provided that any brand of wine not owned by the farm winery licensee is purchased from a wholesale wine licensee. In addition, wine may be pre-mixed by the licensee to be served and sold for on-premises consumption at these business places.

Wine importer’s licenses, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and deliver or ship wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons in the Commonwealth licensed to sell such wine at wholesale for the purpose of resale, and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

Beer importer’s licenses, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and deliver or ship beer, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons in the Commonwealth licensed to sell such beer at wholesale for the purpose of resale and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

History.

2020, cc. 756, 1008, 1113, 1114.

Section set out twice.

The section set out above is effective July 1, 2024. For the version of this section effective until July 1, 2024, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

4.1-206.1

.

§ 4.1-206.2.
Wholesale licenses.

The Board may grant the following wholesale licenses:

Wholesale beer licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of beer and to sell and deliver or ship the beer from one or more premises identified in the license, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers to (i) persons licensed under this chapter to sell such beer at wholesale or retail for the purpose of resale, (ii) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state, and (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.No wholesale beer licensee shall purchase beer for resale from a person outside the Commonwealth who does not hold a beer importer’s license unless such wholesale beer licensee holds a beer importer’s license and purchases beer for resale pursuant to the privileges of such beer importer’s license.

Wholesale wine licenses, including those granted pursuant to subdivision 3, which shall authorize the licensee to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of wine and to sell and deliver or ship the wine from one or more premises identified in the license, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to (i) persons licensed to sell such wine in the Commonwealth, (ii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth, (iii) religious congregations for use only for sacramental purposes, and (iv) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state.No wholesale wine licensee shall purchase wine for resale from a person outside the Commonwealth who does not hold a wine importer’s license unless such wholesale wine licensee holds a wine importer’s license and purchases wine for resale pursuant to the privileges of such wine importer’s license.

Restricted wholesale wine licenses, which shall authorize a nonprofit, nonstock corporation created in accordance with subdivision B 2 of §

3.2-102

to provide wholesale wine distribution services to winery and farm winery licensees, provided that no more than 3,000 cases of wine produced by a winery or farm winery licensee shall be distributed by the corporation in any one year. The corporation shall provide such distribution services in accordance with the terms of a written agreement approved by the corporation between it and the winery or farm winery licensee, which shall comply with the provisions of this subtitle and Board regulations. The corporation shall receive all of the privileges of, and be subject to, all laws and regulations governing wholesale wine licenses granted under subdivision 2.

History.

2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 5, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That any person who (i) is licensed pursuant to subdivision A 9, 11, 12, 14, 18, or 19 of
§

4.1-206

of the Code of Virginia, as it was in effect prior to July 1, 2020, and (ii) wishes to maintain licensure after December 31, 2021, shall apply for a marketplace license on or before July 1, 2021.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or
§

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”